Washington statutes.
RCW 39.110.005

Findings—Purpose.

(1) The legislature finds that the issuance of taxable nonrecourse revenue bonds by the Washington economic development finance authority has provided a number of Washington firms with the financing necessary to grow and create jobs. The legislature further finds that municipal authority to issue taxable nonrecourse revenue bonds does not exist and that authorizing the local issuance of taxable bonds for economic development purposes will increase local capacity to strengthen businesses and create jobs.

(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to grant new authority for cities, counties, and port districts that created public corporations under chapter 39.84 RCW prior to 2012, in order to build on the expertise with tax-exempt nonrecourse revenue bond financing developed by these municipalities. Therefore, these municipalities are permitted to create local economic development finance authorities to act as a financial conduit that, without using state or local government funds or lending the credit of the state or local governments, can issue taxable and nontaxable nonrecourse revenue bonds, and participate in federal, state, and local economic development programs to help facilitate access to needed capital by Washington businesses. It is also a primary purpose of this chapter to encourage the development of local innovative approaches to the problem of unmet capital needs. This chapter must be construed liberally to carry out its purposes and objectives.

[ 2012 c 193 s 1.]